Hawaii statutes.
§486K-6 Hotelkeeper's liability in case of
fire, etc. A hotelkeeper shall only be liable to any guest of the hotel
for ordinary and reasonable care in the custody of money, jewels, bank notes,
precious stones, transportation tickets, negotiable or valuable papers,
ornaments, baggage, wearing apparel, or other chattels or property belonging to
any guest, whether specially entrusted to the keeper or the keeper's agent, or
deposited in the safe of the hotel, for any loss occasioned by fire or by any
other cause or force over which the hotelkeeper had no control. [L 1978, c 234,
pt of §3; gen ch 1985; am L 2008, c 19, §66]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next